Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.565

Capital community assistance account.

The capital community assistance account is created in the state treasury. Revenues to the account shall consist of appropriations and transfers by the legislature and all other moneys directed for deposit into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Moneys in the account may be used for capital costs to provide community support services, and for infrastructure and other capital expenditures to support the well-being of communities.

[ 2022 c 297 s 946.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 297: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [March 31, 2022]." [ 2022 c 297 s 969.]